Louisiana, session 2026, SB454.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 16:51(A) and 54(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§51. Assistant district attorneys
A. The district attorney of each judicial district and of the parish of Orleans
shall appoint a first assistant district attorney and such other assistant district
attorneys for his respective judicial district or for the parish of Orleans as may be
necessary, the total number of assistant district attorneys in each judicial district and
in the parish of Orleans to be shall not be less than the following:
(1) Judicial districts with a total population of ten thousand or less
persons according to the latest federal decennial census, one assistant district
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-667 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 454
attorney.
(2) Judicial districts with a total population of more than ten thousand
but not more than one hundred thousand persons according to the latest federal
decennial census, one assistant district attorney per each seven thousand
persons.
(3) Judicial districts with a total population of more than one hundred
thousand persons according to the latest federal decennial census, one assistant
district attorney per each seven thousand five hundred persons.
(1) In the First Judicial District, thirty-five assistant district attorneys;
(2) In the Second Judicial District, ten assistant district attorneys;
(3) In the Third Judicial District, nine assistant district attorneys;
(4) In the Fourth Judicial District, twenty-six assistant district attorneys;
(5) In the Fifth Judicial District, seven assistant district attorneys;
(6) In the Sixth Judicial District, seven assistant district attorneys;
(7) In the Seventh Judicial District, six assistant district attorneys;
(8) In the Eighth Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys;
(9) In the Ninth Judicial District, fifteen assistant district attorneys;
(10) In the Tenth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(11) In the Eleventh Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys;
(12) In the Twelfth Judicial District, eight assistant district attorneys;
(13) In the Thirteenth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(14) In the Fourteenth Judicial District, twenty-five assistant district
attorneys;
(15) In the Fifteenth Judicial District, twenty-eight assistant district attorneys;
(16) In the Sixteenth Judicial District, twenty-three assistant district
attorneys;
(17) In the Seventeenth Judicial District, thirteen assistant district attorneys;
(18) In the Eighteenth Judicial District, thirteen assistant district attorneys;
(19) In the Nineteenth Judicial District, fifty-five assistant district attorneys;
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-667 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 454
(20) In the Twentieth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(21) In the Twenty-First Judicial District, nineteen assistant district attorneys;
(22) In the Twenty-Second Judicial District, thirty assistant district attorneys;
(23) In the Twenty-Third Judicial District, nineteen assistant district
attorneys;
(24) In the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District, fifty-four assistant district
attorneys;
(25) In the Twenty-Fifth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(26) In the Twenty-Sixth Judicial District, thirteen assistant district attorneys;
(27) In the Twenty-Seventh Judicial District, twelve assistant district
attorneys;
(28) In the Twenty-Eighth Judicial District, three assistant district attorneys;
(29) In the Twenty-Ninth Judicial District, ten assistant district attorneys;
(30) In the Thirtieth Judicial District, six assistant district attorneys;
(31) In the Thirty-First Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys;
(32) In the Thirty-Second Judicial District, twenty-one assistant district
attorneys;
(33) In the Thirty-Third Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys;
(34) In the Thirty-Fourth Judicial District, nine assistant district attorneys;
(35) In the Thirty-Fifth Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys;
(36) In the Thirty-Sixth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(37) In the Thirty-Seventh Judicial District, three assistant district attorneys;
(38) In the parish of Orleans, eighty-three assistant district attorneys;
(39) In the Thirty-Eighth Judicial District, two assistant district attorneys;
(40) In the Thirty-Ninth Judicial District, two assistant district attorneys;
(41) In the Fortieth Judicial District, nine assistant district attorneys;
(42) In the Forty-Second Judicial District, four assistant district attorneys.
* * *
§54. Advisory and Review Commission on Assistant District Attorneys; purposes;
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-667 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 454
membership; appointments; expenses; rules; meetings
A. There is hereby created within the office of the governor the Governor's
Advisory and Review Commission on Assistant District Attorneys, hereafter referred
to as the commission, to advise the governor and the legislature with respect to state
funded additional assistant district attorney positions in the respective judicial
districts and the parish of Orleans. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 16:53, the
determination of the commission as to the necessity for each additional district
attorney position in each judicial district shall be final, and no position of additional
assistant district attorney to be paid by the state shall be enacted without the approval
of the commission; however, such approval shall not be required for any
reallocation of authorized assistant district attorney positions among judicial
districts in R.S. 16:51, provided that the total number of such positions
authorized statewide is not increased.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.